Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201446-708
Action to control or prevent runoff
of water; natural resources district; rules and regulations; power to issue
cease and desist orders; notice; hearing.

(1) In order to
conserve ground water supplies and to prevent the inefficient or improper
runoff of such ground water, each person who uses ground water irrigation
in the state shall take action to control or prevent the runoff of water used
in such irrigation.

(2) Each district shall adopt, following public hearing, notice of which
shall be given in the manner provided in section 46-743, rules and regulations
necessary to control or prohibit surface runoff of water derived from ground
water irrigation. Such rules and regulations shall prescribe (a) standards
and criteria delineating what constitutes the inefficient or improper runoff
of ground water used in irrigation, (b) procedures to prevent, control, and
abate such runoff, (c) measures for the construction, modification, extension,
or operation of remedial measures to prevent, control, or abate runoff of
ground water used in irrigation, and (d) procedures for the enforcement of
this section.

(3) Each district may, upon three days' notice to the
person affected, stating the contemplated action and in general the grounds
therefor, and upon reasonable opportunity to be heard, issue cease and desist
orders to enforce any of the provisions of this section or rules and regulations
issued pursuant to this section.

Laws 1975, LB 577, § 9;

Laws 1978, LB 217, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 46-664;

Laws 1996, LB 108, § 17;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 46-656.11;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 48;

Laws 2014, LB513, § 2.
July 18, 2014